Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Area median income” means the median income  for households established by the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
(b) “Existing housing stock” means housing, by  affordability level and type, actually
constructed in a city or Metro.
(c) “High income” means above 120 percent of the area median income.
(d) “Housing shortage” means  the difference between the estimated housing units of
different affordability  levels and housing types needed to accommodate the existing popu-
lation and the existing housing stock, measured in dwelling units.
(e) “Low income” means income above 50 percent and at or below  80 percent of the area
median income.
(f) “Metro” means a metropolitan service district organized under ORS chapter 268.
(g) “Moderate income” means income above 80 percent  and at or below 120 percent of the
area median income.
(h) “Region” has the meaning given that term in ORS 284.752.
(i) “Very low income” means income at or below 50 percent of the area median income.
(2) The Housing and Community Services Department, in  coordination with the Depart-
ment of Land Conservation and  Development and the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services, shall develop a methodology for calculating:
(a) A regional housing needs analysis that identifies  the total number of housing units
necessary to  accommodate anticipated populations in a region over the next 20 years based
on:
(A) Trends in density and in the average mix of  housing types of urban residential de-
velopment;
(B) Demographic and population trends;
(C) Economic trends and cycles; and
(D) Equitable distribution of publicly supported housing within a region.
(b) An estimate of existing housing stock of each city and Metro.
(c) A housing shortage analysis for each city and Metro.
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 1
(d) An estimate of the number of  housing units necessary to accommodate anticipated
population growth over the next 20 years for each city and Metro.
(3) The methodologies  for calculating the regional housing needs analysis, the estimate
of existing housing stock,  the housing shortage analysis and the estimate of housing neces-
sary to accommodate growth that are developed under subsection (2) of this  section must
classify housing by:
(a) Housing type, including attached and  detached single-family housing, multifamily
housing and manufactured dwellings or mobile homes; and
(b) Affordability, by housing that is affordable to households with:
(A) Very low income;
(B) Low income;
(C) Moderate income; or
(D) High income.
(4) No later than September 1, 2020, the Housing  and Community Services Department,
in coordination with the  Department of Land Conservation and Development and the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, shall conduct for each region  a regional housing
needs analysis and, for each city  and Metro, shall estimate existing housing stock, conduct
a housing shortage analysis and estimate the housing necessary to accommodate growth.
(5) In developing the methodologies and conducting the analyses under this  section, the
Housing and Community Services Department may:
(a) Consult or contract  with subject matter experts, cities and Metro, regional solutions
centers described in ORS 284.754 (2) and other jurisdictions that have  created or conducted
regional housing needs analyses.
(b) Consider the most recent consolidated  population forecast produced by the Portland
State University Population Research Center in  making any relevant calculation or forecast.
(c) Consider any other relevant existing  analyses, data and other information collected
or produced by state agencies or public entities.
(d) Make changes to the regional boundaries in order to make  regions more accurately
align with shared employment, transportation or housing market dynamics.
SECTION 2.
(1) No later than March 1, 2021, the Housing and Community Services De-
partment, in consultation with  the Department of Land Conservation and Development and
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, shall submit a report,  in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245 to an appropriate  committee of the Legislative Assembly, that
summarizes the findings  of the regional housing needs analysis, estimate of housing stock,
housing shortage analysis and estimate of  housing necessary to accommodate growth con-
ducted under section 1 (4) of this 2019 Act.
(2) No later than March 1, 2021, the  Department of Land Conservation and Development,
in consultation with the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and the Housing and
Community Services Department, shall submit  a report, in the manner provided in ORS
192.245, to an appropriate committee of the Legislative Assembly that evaluates:
(a) Whether a regional housing needs  analysis and housing shortage analysis described
in section 1 of this 2019 Act could appropriately  allocate among the cities or local govern-
ments in a region the housing shortage described;
(b) How a regional housing needs analysis and  housing shortage analysis may compare
to existing assessments of housing need and capacity conducted by local governments  under
ORS 197.296 (3) and (10) in terms of:
(A) Cost and cost effectiveness;
(B) Reliability and accuracy;
(C) Repeatability; and
(D) Predictability;
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 2
(c) How a regional housing needs analysis and housing shortage analysis  may relate to
statewide planning goals related to housing and any rules and policies adopted pursuant  to
these goals and ORS 197.295 to 197.314;
(d) Whether different boundaries would be  more appropriate for defining regions within
the regional housing needs analysis based on:
(A) Relevance  of data in appropriately defining a commuting, employment or housing
market; or
(B) Ease or cost of collecting or analyzing data;
(e) Other ways in which the regional housing needs analysis or housing  shortage analysis
could be improved; and
(f) Whether the regional housing needs analysis, or an improved  version, could serve as
an acceptable methodology statewide for land use planning relating to housing.
(3) In preparing the report required under subsection  (2) of this section, the Department
of Land Conservation and Development may consult or contract with other state agencies,
subject matter experts, private firms, local governments, regional  solutions centers de-
scribed in ORS 284.754 (2) and other jurisdictions that have created or  conducted regional
housing needs analyses.
SECTION 3.
Sections 4 to 6 of this  2019 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 197.295
to 197.314.
SECTION 4. (1) A city with a population greater than 10,000 shall develop and  adopt a
housing production strategy under this section no later than one year after:
(a) The city’s deadline  for completing a housing capacity analysis under ORS 197.296
(2)(a);
(b) The city’s deadline for completing a housing capacity analysis  under ORS 197.296
(10)(b); or
(c) A date scheduled by the Land  Conservation and Development Commission following
the allocation of housing capacity to the city by a metropolitan service district  under ORS
197.299 (2)(d).
(2) A housing production strategy must include a list of specific actions, including the
adoption of measures and policies, that the city shall undertake  to promote development
within the city to  address a housing need identified under ORS 197.296 (6) for the most recent
20-year period described in ORS 197.296 (2)(b). Actions under this subsection may include:
(a) The reduction of financial and regulatory impediments  to developing needed housing,
including removing or easing approval standards or procedures for needed  housing at higher
densities or that is affordable;
(b) The creation of financial and regulatory incentives for development  of needed hous-
ing, including creating incentives for needed housing at  higher densities or that is affordable;
and
(c) The development of a plan to access resources available at local, regional,  state and
national levels to increase the availability and affordability of needed housing.
(3) In creating a housing production strategy, a city shall review and consider:
(a) Socioeconomic and demographic characteristics of households  living in existing
needed housing;
(b) Market conditions affecting the provision of needed housing;
(c) Measures already adopted by the city to promote the development  of needed housing;
(d) Existing and expected barriers to the development of needed housing; and
(e) For each action the city includes in its housing production strategy:
(A) The schedule for its adoption;
(B) The schedule for its implementation;
(C) Its expected magnitude of impact on the development of needed housing; and
(D) The time frame over which it is expected to impact needed housing.
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 3
(4) The housing production strategy must include within its index  a copy of the city’s
most recently completed survey under section 1 (2), chapter 47, Oregon Laws 2018.
(5) The  adoption of a housing production strategy is not a land use decision and is not
subject to appeal or review except as provided in section 5 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) No later than 20 days after a city’s adoption or amendment of a  housing
production strategy under section 4 of this 2019 Act, a city shall submit the  adopted strategy
or amended strategy to the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(2) The submission under subsection (1) of this section must include copies of:
(a) The signed decision adopting the housing production strategy or amended strategy;
(b) The text of the housing production strategy clearly indicating  any amendments to the
most recent strategy submitted under this section;
(c) A brief narrative summary of the housing production strategy; and
(d) The information reviewed and considered under section 6 (2) of this 2019 Act.
(3) On the same day the city submits notice of the housing production strategy  or
amended strategy, the city shall provide a notice to persons that participated  in the pro-
ceedings that led to the adoption of the strategy and requested notice in writing.
(4) Within 10 days of receipt of the submission under subsection  (1) of this section, the
department shall provide notice to persons described under ORS 197.615 (3).
(5) The notices given under subsections (3) and (4) of this section must state:
(a) How and where materials described in subsection (2) of  this section may be freely
obtained;
(b) That comments on the strategy may be submitted to the department within 45  days
after the department has received the submission; and
(c) That there is no further right of appeal.
(6) Based upon criteria adopted by the Land  Conservation and Development Commission,
including any criteria adopted under section 6 (2)  of this 2019 Act, the department shall,
within 120 days after receiving the submission under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Approve the housing production strategy;
(b) Approve the housing production strategy, subject to further review and  actions under
section 6 (2) of this 2019 Act; or
(c) Remand the housing production strategy for further modification as identified by  the
department.
(7) A determination by the department under subsection (6)  of this section is not a land
use decision and is final and not subject to appeal.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Land Conservation and Development Commission, in consultation
with the Housing and Community Services Department, shall adopt criteria for reviewing and
identifying cities with a population greater than 10,000 that have not sufficiently:
(a) Achieved production of needed housing within their jurisdiction; or
(b) Implemented a housing production strategy adopted under section 4 of this 2019 Act.
(2) The criteria adopted by the commission under subsection  (1) of this section may in-
clude the city’s:
(a) Unmet housing need as described in ORS 197.296 (6);
(b) Unmet housing need in proportion to the city’s population;
(c) Percentage of households identified as severely rent burdened as described in section
1, chapter 47, Oregon Laws 2018;
(d) Recent housing development;
(e) Recent adoption of a housing production strategy  under section 4 of this 2019 Act or
adoption of actions pursuant to a housing production strategy;
(f) Recent or  frequent previous identification by the Department of Land Conservation
and Development under this section; or
(g) Other attributes that the commission considers relevant.
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 4
(3) The Department of Land Conservation  and Development may review cities under the
criteria adopted under subsection (2) of this section for the  purposes of prioritizing actions
by the department, including:
(a) Awarding available technical or financial resources;
(b) Providing enhanced review and oversight of the city’s housing production strategy;
(c) Requiring a report and explanation  if a city does not implement an action within the
approximate time frame scheduled within a housing production strategy;
(d) Entering into agreements with the city relating to the city’s modification  or imple-
mentation of its housing production strategy; or
(e) Petitioning the commission to act under ORS 197.319 to 197.335 to require the city to
comply with ORS 197.295 to  197.314 or statewide land use planning goals related to housing
or urbanization.
SECTION 7.
No later than December 31, 2019, the Land Conservation and Development
Commission shall adopt a schedule by which metropolitan service districts and cities de-
scribed in ORS 197.296 (2)(a)(B)  and (10)(c)(B) shall demonstrate sufficient buildable lands.
Dates in the schedule may not be earlier than two years following the commission’s creation
of rules implementing sections 4 to 6 of this 2019 Act and the amendments to ORS 197.296
and 197.299 by sections 8 and 9 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 197.296 is amended to read:
197.296. (1)(a) The provisions of subsections (2) to (9) of this section apply to metropolitan  ser-
vice district regional framework plans and local  government comprehensive plans for lands within
the urban growth boundary of a city that is  located outside of a metropolitan service district and
has a population of 25,000 or more.
(b) The  Land Conservation and Development Commission may establish a set of factors under
which additional cities are subject to the provisions of this section. In  establishing the set of factors
required under this paragraph, the commission shall consider the  size of the city, the rate of popu-
lation growth of the city or the proximity of the city to another city with a population of  25,000 or
more or to a metropolitan service district.
(2)(a) [ At periodic  review pursuant to ORS 197.628 to 197.651 or at any other legislative review
of the  comprehensive plan or regional framework plan that concerns the urban growth boundary and
requires the application of a statewide planning goal relating to buildable lands for residential use, ]
A local government shall demonstrate that  its comprehensive plan or regional framework plan pro-
vides sufficient buildable lands within  the urban growth boundary established pursuant to statewide
planning goals to accommodate estimated housing needs for 20 years :
(A) At periodic review under ORS 197.628 to 197.651;
(B) As scheduled by the commission:
(i) At least once each eight years for local governments  that are not within a metropol-
itan service district; or
(ii) At least once each six years for a metropolitan service district; or
(C) At any other legislative review of the comprehensive plan  or regional framework plan
that concerns the urban growth boundary and requires  the application of a statewide plan-
ning goal relating to buildable lands for residential use .
(b) The 20-year period shall commence on the date initially scheduled for completion of the
[periodic or legislative ] review  under paragraph (a) of this subsection .
(3) In performing the duties under subsection (2) of this section, a local government shall:
(a) Inventory the supply of buildable lands within the urban growth boundary and  determine the
housing capacity of the buildable lands; and
(b) Conduct an  analysis of housing need by type and density range, in accordance with ORS
197.303 and statewide planning goals and rules relating  to housing, to determine the number of units
and amount of land needed for each needed housing type for the next 20 years.
(4)(a) For the  purpose of the inventory described in subsection (3)(a) of this section, “buildable
lands”  includes:
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 5
(A) Vacant lands planned or zoned for residential use;
(B) Partially vacant lands planned or zoned for residential use;
(C) Lands that may be used for a mix of residential and employment uses  under the existing
planning or zoning; and
(D) Lands that may be used for residential infill or redevelopment.
(b) For  the purpose of the inventory and determination of housing capacity described in sub-
section (3)(a) of this section, the local government must demonstrate consideration of:
(A) The extent that residential  development is prohibited or restricted by local regulation and
ordinance, state law and rule or federal statute and regulation;
(B) A written long term contract or easement for radio, telecommunications or  electrical facili-
ties, if the written contract or easement is provided to the local government; and
(C) The presence of a single family dwelling or other structure on a lot or parcel.
(c) Except for land that may be used for residential infill or redevelopment, a local  government
shall create a map or document that may be used to  verify and identify specific lots or parcels that
have been determined to be buildable lands.
(5)(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and  (c) of this subsection, the determination of
housing capacity and need pursuant to subsection (3) of this section  must be based on data relating
to land within the urban  growth boundary that has been collected since the last [ periodic] review
[or] under subsection  (2)(a)(B) of this section [five years, whichever is greater ]. The data shall
include:
(A) The number, density and average mix of housing  types of urban residential development that
have actually occurred;
(B) Trends in density and average mix of housing types of urban residential development;
(C) Demographic and population trends;
(D) Economic trends and cycles; and
(E) The number, density and average mix of housing types  that have occurred on the buildable
lands described in subsection (4)(a) of this section.
(b) A local government shall make the determination described in paragraph (a) of this  sub-
section using a  shorter time period than the time period described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section if the local government finds that the shorter time period will provide more accurate and
reliable data related to housing capacity and need. The shorter time period may not be  less than
three years.
(c) A local government shall use data  from a wider geographic area or use a time period for
economic cycles and trends longer than the time  period described in paragraph (a) of this subsection
if the analysis of a wider geographic area or  the use of a longer time period will provide more ac-
curate, complete and reliable  data relating to trends affecting housing need than an analysis per-
formed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection. The local government must clearly describe  the
geographic area, time frame and source of data used in a determination performed  under this para-
graph.
(6) If the housing need  determined pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section is greater than
the housing capacity determined pursuant  to subsection (3)(a) of this section, the local government
shall take one or more of the following actions to accommodate the additional housing need:
(a) Amend its urban growth boundary to include sufficient buildable  lands to accommodate
housing needs for the next 20 years. As part of this process, the local  government shall consider the
effects of measures taken pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection. The amendment shall  include
sufficient land reasonably  necessary to accommodate the siting of new public school facilities. The
need and inclusion of lands for new public school facilities shall  be a coordinated process between
the affected public school districts and the local  government that has the authority to approve the
urban growth boundary;
(b) Amend  its comprehensive plan, regional framework plan, functional plan or land use regu-
lations to include new measures that demonstrably increase  the likelihood that residential develop-
ment will occur at densities sufficient to accommodate housing needs for the next 20 years without
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 6
expansion of the urban growth  boundary. A local government or metropolitan service district that
takes this action shall monitor and  record the level of development activity and development density
by housing type following the date of the adoption of the new measures; or
(c) Adopt a combination of the actions described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(7) Using the analysis conducted under subsection (3)(b) of  this section, the local government
shall determine the overall average density and overall mix of housing types at  which residential
development of needed housing types must occur in  order to meet housing needs over the next 20
years. If  that density is greater than the actual density of development determined under subsection
(5)(a)(A) of this section, or if that mix  is different from the actual mix of housing types determined
under subsection  (5)(a)(A) of this section, the local government, as part of its periodic review, shall
adopt measures that demonstrably  increase the likelihood that residential development will occur
at the housing types and density and at the mix of housing types required to meet  housing needs
over the next 20 years.
(8)(a) A local  government outside a metropolitan service district that takes any actions under
subsection (6) or (7) of this section shall demonstrate that the  comprehensive plan and land use
regulations comply with  goals and rules adopted by the commission and implement ORS 197.295 to
197.314.
(b) The local government shall determine the density and mix of housing types anticipated as a
result of actions taken under subsections (6) and  (7) of this section and monitor and record the ac-
tual density and  mix of housing types achieved. The local government shall compare actual and
anticipated density and  mix. The local government shall submit its comparison to the commission
at the next [ periodic review or at the next legislative ] review of its urban growth boundary[ , which-
ever comes first ] under subsection (2)(a) of this section .
(9) In establishing that actions and measures adopted under subsections (6) and (7) of this sec-
tion demonstrably increase the likelihood  of higher density residential development, the local gov-
ernment shall  at a minimum ensure that land zoned for needed housing is in locations appropriate
for the housing types identified under subsection (3) of this section and is zoned at  density ranges
that are likely to be achieved by the housing market using the analysis in subsection (3) of this
section. Actions or measures, or both, may include but are not limited to:
(a) Increases in the permitted density on existing residential land;
(b) Financial incentives for higher density housing;
(c) Provisions permitting additional density beyond that generally allowed  in the zoning district
in exchange for amenities and features provided by the developer;
(d) Removal or easing of approval standards or procedures;
(e) Minimum density ranges;
(f) Redevelopment and infill strategies;
(g) Authorization of housing types not previously allowed by the plan or regulations;
(h) Adoption of an average residential density standard; and
(i) Rezoning or redesignation of nonresidential land.
(10)(a) The provisions of this subsection apply to local government comprehensive plans for
lands within the urban growth boundary of a city that is located outside of  a metropolitan service
district and has a population of less than 25,000.
(b) [ At periodic  review pursuant to ORS 197.628 to 197.651 or at any other legislative review of
the comprehensive plan that requires the application of a statewide  planning goal relating to buildable
lands for residential use, ] As required under paragraph (c) of this subsection,  a city shall, ac-
cording to rules of the commission:
(A) Determine the estimated housing needs within the jurisdiction for the next 20 years;
(B) Inventory the supply of buildable lands available within  the urban growth boundary to ac-
commodate the estimated housing needs determined under this subsection; and
(C) Adopt measures necessary  to accommodate the estimated housing needs determined under
this subsection.
(c) The actions required under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be undertaken:
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 7
(A) At periodic review pursuant to ORS 197.628 to 197.651;
(B) On a schedule established  by the commission for cities with a population greater than
10,000, not to exceed once each eight years; or
(C) At  any other legislative review of the comprehensive plan that requires the applica-
tion of a statewide planning goal relating to buildable lands for residential use.
[(c)] (d) For the purpose of the inventory described in  this subsection, “buildable lands” includes
those lands described in subsection (4)(a) of this section.
SECTION 8a.
If House Bill 2001 becomes law, section  8 of this 2019 Act (amending ORS
197.296) is repealed and ORS  197.296, as amended by section 5, chapter , Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 2001), is amended to read:
197.296. (1)(a) The provisions of subsections (2) to (9) of this section apply to metropolitan  ser-
vice district regional framework plans and local  government comprehensive plans for lands within
the urban growth boundary of a city that is  located outside of a metropolitan service district and
has a population of 25,000 or more.
(b) The  Land Conservation and Development Commission may establish a set of factors under
which additional cities are subject to the provisions of this section. In  establishing the set of factors
required under this paragraph, the commission shall consider the  size of the city, the rate of popu-
lation growth of the city or the proximity of the city to another city with a population of  25,000 or
more or to a metropolitan service district.
(2)(a) [ At periodic  review pursuant to ORS 197.628 to 197.651 or at any other legislative review
of the  comprehensive plan or regional framework plan that concerns the urban growth boundary and
requires the application of a statewide planning goal relating to buildable lands for residential use, ]
A local government shall demonstrate that  its comprehensive plan or regional framework plan pro-
vides sufficient buildable lands within  the urban growth boundary established pursuant to statewide
planning goals to accommodate estimated housing needs for 20 years :
(A) At periodic review under ORS 197.628 to 197.651;
(B) As scheduled by the commission:
(i) At least once each eight years for local governments  that are not within a metropol-
itan service district; or
(ii) At least once each six years for a metropolitan service district; or
(C) At any other legislative review of the comprehensive plan  or regional framework plan
that concerns the urban growth boundary and requires  the application of a statewide plan-
ning goal relating to buildable lands for residential use .
(b) The 20-year period shall commence on the date initially scheduled for completion of the
[periodic or legislative ] review  under paragraph (a) of this subsection .
(3) In performing the duties under subsection (2) of this section, a local government shall:
(a) Inventory the supply of buildable lands within the urban growth boundary and  determine the
housing capacity of the buildable lands; and
(b) Conduct an analysis of existing and projected housing  need by type and density range, in
accordance with all factors under  ORS 197.303 and statewide planning goals and rules relating to
housing, to determine the number of units and amount of land needed  for each needed housing type
for the next 20 years.
(4)(a) For the purpose of the inventory described in subsection (3)(a) of this  section, “buildable
lands” includes:
(A) Vacant lands planned or zoned for residential use;
(B) Partially vacant lands planned or zoned for residential use;
(C) Lands that may  be used for a mix of residential and employment uses under the existing
planning or zoning; and
(D) Lands that may be used for residential infill or redevelopment.
(b) For the purpose of the inventory and determination of housing capacity described in  sub-
section (3)(a) of this section, the local government must demonstrate consideration of:
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 8
(A) The extent that residential development is prohibited or restricted  by local regulation and
ordinance, state law and rule or federal statute and regulation;
(B) A written  long term contract or easement for radio, telecommunications or electrical facili-
ties, if the written contract or easement is provided to the local government; and
(C) The presence of a single family dwelling or other structure on a lot or parcel.
(c) Except for land that may be used for residential infill or redevelopment, a local  government
shall create a map or document that may be used to  verify and identify specific lots or parcels that
have been determined to be buildable lands.
(5)(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and  (c) of this subsection, the determination of
housing capacity  pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section must be based on data relating to land
within the urban growth boundary that has been collected since the last  review [ or six years,
whichever is greater ] under subsection (2)(a)(B) of this section . The data shall include:
(A) The number, density and average mix of housing  types of urban residential development that
have actually occurred;
(B) Trends in density and average mix of housing types of urban residential development;
(C) Market factors that may substantially impact future urban residential development; and
(D) The number, density and average mix of housing types that have  occurred on the buildable
lands described in subsection (4)(a) of this section.
(b) A local government shall make the determination described in paragraph (a) of this  sub-
section using a  shorter time period than the time period described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section if the local government finds that the shorter time period will provide more accurate and
reliable data related to housing capacity. The shorter  time period may not be less than three years.
(c) A local government shall use data  from a wider geographic area or use a time period longer
than the time period described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection if the analysis of a wider ge-
ographic area or the use of a longer  time period will provide more accurate, complete and reliable
data relating to trends affecting  housing need than an analysis performed pursuant to paragraph (a)
of this subsection. The local government must clearly describe the geographic area, time  frame and
source of data used in a determination performed under this paragraph.
(6) If the housing need determined pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this  section is greater than
the housing capacity determined pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this  section, the local government
shall take one or both of the following actions to accommodate the additional housing need:
(a) Amend its urban  growth boundary to include sufficient buildable lands to accommodate
housing needs for the next 20 years. As part of this process, the local  government shall consider the
effects of measures taken pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection. The amendment shall  include
sufficient land reasonably necessary to accommodate the siting of new public school  facilities. The
need and inclusion of lands for  new public school facilities shall be a coordinated process between
the affected public school districts and the local government  that has the authority to approve the
urban growth boundary.
(b) Amend its comprehensive plan, regional framework plan, functional plan or land use  regu-
lations to include new measures that  demonstrably increase the likelihood that residential develop-
ment will occur at densities sufficient to accommodate housing needs for the next 20 years without
expansion of the urban growth boundary. A local government or  metropolitan service district that
takes this action  shall adopt findings regarding the density expectations assumed to result from
measures adopted  under this paragraph based upon the factors listed in ORS 197.303 (2) and data
in subsection (5)(a) of this section. The density expectations may not project an increase in  resi-
dential capacity above achieved density by more than three percent without  quantifiable validation
of such departures. For a local government  located outside of a metropolitan service district, a
quantifiable validation must demonstrate that the assumed housing capacity  has been achieved in
areas that are zoned to allow no greater than  the same authorized density level within the local
jurisdiction  or  a jurisdiction in the same region. For a metropolitan service district, a quantifiable
validation must demonstrate that the  assumed housing capacity has been achieved in areas that are
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 9
zoned to allow no greater  than the same authorized density level within the metropolitan service
district.
(c) As used in this subsection, “authorized density  level” has the meaning given that term in
ORS 227.175.
(7) Using the  housing need analysis conducted under subsection (3)(b) of this section, the local
government shall determine the overall average density and overall mix of housing types at which
residential development of needed housing types must occur  in order to meet housing needs over the
next 20 years. If that density is greater than the actual density of development  determined under
subsection (5)(a)(A) of  this section, or if that mix is different from the actual mix of housing types
determined under  subsection (5)(a)(A) of this section, the local government, as part of its periodic
review, shall adopt  measures that demonstrably increase the likelihood that residential development
will occur  at the housing types and density and at the mix of housing types required to meet housing
needs over the next 20 years.
(8)(a) A local government outside a metropolitan service district that takes any  actions under
subsection (6) or (7) of this  section shall demonstrate that the comprehensive plan and land use
regulations comply with goals and rules adopted by the commission and implement ORS  197.295 to
197.314.
(b) A local government shall determine the density and mix of housing types anticipated as  a
result of actions taken under subsections (6) and  (7) of this section and monitor and record the ac-
tual density and mix of housing types achieved following the adoption of these  actions. The local
government shall compare actual and anticipated density and mix.  The local government shall sub-
mit its comparison to the commission at the next [ periodic review  or at the next legislative ] review
of its urban growth boundary[ , whichever comes first ] under subsection (2)(a) of this section .
(9) In establishing that actions and measures adopted under subsections (6) and (7) of this sec-
tion demonstrably increase the likelihood  of higher density residential development, the local gov-
ernment shall  at a minimum ensure that land zoned for needed housing is in locations appropriate
for the housing types identified under subsection (3) of this section, is zoned at  density ranges that
are likely to be achieved by the housing  market using the analysis in subsection (3) of this section
and is in  areas where sufficient urban services are planned to enable the higher density development
to occur over the 20-year period. Actions or measures, or both, may  include but are not limited to:
(a) Increases in the permitted density on existing residential land;
(b) Financial incentives for higher density housing;
(c) Provisions permitting additional density beyond that generally allowed  in the zoning district
in exchange for amenities and features provided by the developer;
(d) Removal or easing of approval standards or procedures;
(e) Minimum density ranges;
(f) Redevelopment and infill strategies;
(g) Authorization of housing types not previously allowed by the plan or regulations;
(h) Adoption of an average residential density standard; and
(i) Rezoning or redesignation of nonresidential land.
(10)(a) The provisions of this subsection apply to local government comprehensive plans for
lands within the urban growth boundary of a city that is located outside of  a metropolitan service
district and has a population of less than 25,000.
(b) [ At periodic  review pursuant to ORS 197.628 to 197.651 or at any other legislative review of
the comprehensive plan that requires the application of a statewide  planning goal relating to buildable
lands for residential use, ] As required under paragraph (c) of this subsection,  a city shall, ac-
cording to rules of the commission:
(A) Determine the estimated housing needs within the jurisdiction for the next 20 years;
(B) Inventory the supply of buildable lands available within  the urban growth boundary to ac-
commodate the estimated housing needs determined under this subsection; and
(C) Adopt measures necessary  to accommodate the estimated housing needs determined under
this subsection.
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 10
(c) The actions required under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be undertaken:
(A) At periodic review pursuant to ORS 197.628 to 197.651;
(B) On a schedule established  by the commission for cities with a population greater than
10,000, not to exceed once each eight years; or
(C) At  any other legislative review of the comprehensive plan that requires the applica-
tion of a statewide planning goal relating to buildable lands for residential use.
[(c)] (d) For the purpose of the inventory described in  this subsection, “buildable lands” includes
those lands described in subsection (4)(a) of this section.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 197.299 is amended to read:
197.299. (1) A metropolitan service district organized under ORS chapter  268 shall complete the
inventory, determination and analysis required under ORS 197.296 (3) not later than six years  after
completion of the previous inventory, determination and analysis.
(2)(a) The metropolitan service district  shall take such action as necessary under ORS 197.296
(6)(a) to accommodate one-half of a 20-year buildable land supply determined under  ORS 197.296 (3)
within one year of completing the analysis.
(b) The metropolitan  service district shall take all final action under ORS 197.296 (6)(a) neces-
sary to accommodate a 20-year  buildable land supply determined under ORS 197.296 (3) within two
years of completing the analysis.
(c) The metropolitan service district shall take  action under ORS 197.296 (6)(b), within one year
after the analysis required under  ORS 197.296 (3)(b) is completed, to provide sufficient buildable land
within the urban growth boundary to  accommodate the estimated housing needs for 20 years from
the time the actions are completed.
(d) The metropolitan service district shall consider and adopt new  measures that the governing
body deems appropriate under ORS 197.296 (6)(b) and shall allocate any housing  capacity that is
not accommodated under this section to be accommodated by the application of ORS  197.296
(6)(b) by cities within the metropolitan  service district with a population greater than
10,000.
(e) Cities to which  housing capacity is allocated under paragraph (d) of this subsection
shall take steps, at least  once every six years as scheduled by the Land Conservation and
Development Commission, to  demonstrably increase the likelihood that residential develop-
ment will occur at densities sufficient to accommodate housing needs for the next 20  years
as required by ORS 197.296 (6)(b).
(3) The [ Land Conservation and Development ] commission may grant an  extension to the time
limits of subsection  (2) of this section if the Director of the Department of Land Conservation and
Development determines that the metropolitan service district has provided good cause for  failing
to meet the time limits.
(4)(a) The metropolitan service district shall establish a process  to expand the urban growth
boundary to accommodate a need for land for a public school that cannot  reasonably be accommo-
dated within the existing urban growth boundary. The metropolitan  service district shall design the
process  to:
(A) Accommodate  a need that must be accommodated between periodic analyses of urban growth
boundary capacity required by subsection (1) of this section; and
(B) Provide for a final decision on a proposal to  expand the urban growth boundary within four
months after submission of a  complete application by a large school district as defined in ORS
195.110.
(b) At the request of a large school district, the metropolitan  service district shall assist the
large school district to identify school sites required by the school facility  planning process de-
scribed in ORS 195.110.  A need for a public school is a specific type of identified land need under
ORS 197.298 (3).
(5) Three years after completing its  most recent demonstration of sufficient buildable lands un-
der ORS 197.296, a metropolitan service district  may, on a single occasion, revise the determination
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 11
and analysis required as part of the demonstration for the purpose of considering an amendment to
the metropolitan service district’s urban growth boundary, provided:
(a) The metropolitan service district has entered into an intergovernmental  agreement and has
designated rural reserves and urban reserves under ORS  195.141 and 195.145 with each county lo-
cated within the district;
(b) The commission has  acknowledged the rural reserve and urban reserve designations de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(c) One or more cities within  the metropolitan service district have proposed a development that
would require expansion of the urban growth boundary;
(d) The city or cities proposing  the development have provided evidence to the metropolitan
service district that  the proposed development would provide additional needed housing to the
needed housing included in the most recent determination and analysis;
(e) The location chosen for the proposed development is adjacent to the city proposing the de-
velopment; and
(f) The location chosen for the proposed development is located within an area designated  and
acknowledged as an urban reserve.
(6)(a) If a metropolitan service district, after revising its most recent determination  and analysis
pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, concludes that an expansion of its urban  growth boundary
is warranted, the metropolitan service district  may take action to expand its urban growth boundary
in one or more locations to accommodate the proposed development, provided the urban growth
boundary expansion does not exceed a total of 1,000 acres.
(b) A metropolitan service district that  expands its urban growth boundary under this sub-
section:
(A) Must adopt the urban growth boundary expansion not  more than four years after completing
its most recent demonstration of sufficient buildable lands under ORS 197.296; and
(B) Is exempt from the boundary location requirements described in the statewide land  use
planning goals relating to urbanization.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 197.303 is amended to read:
197.303. (1) As used in ORS [ 197.307] 197.295 to 197.314 , “needed housing” means all housing
on land zoned for  residential use or mixed residential and commercial use that is determined to meet
the need shown  for housing within an urban growth boundary at price ranges and rent levels that
are affordable to households within the  county with a variety of incomes, including but not limited
to households with low incomes, very low incomes and extremely low  incomes, as those terms are
defined by the  United States Department of Housing and Urban Development under 42 U.S.C. 1437a.
“Needed housing” includes the following housing types:
(a) Attached and  detached single-family housing and multiple family housing for both owner and
renter occupancy;
(b) Government assisted housing;
(c) Mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks as provided in ORS 197.475 to 197.490;
(d) Manufactured homes on individual lots  planned and zoned for single-family residential use
that are in addition to lots within designated manufactured dwelling subdivisions; and
(e) Housing for farmworkers.
(2) Subsection (1)(a) and (d) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A city with a population of less than 2,500.
(b) A county with a population of less than 15,000.
(3) A local government may take an exception under ORS  197.732 to the definition of “needed
housing” in subsection (1) of  this section in the same manner that an exception may be taken under
the goals.
SECTION 10a.
If House Bill 2001  becomes law, section 10 of this 2019 Act (amending ORS
197.303) is repealed and ORS  197.303, as amended by section 6, chapter , Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 2001), is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 12
197.303. (1) As used in ORS 197.295 to 197.314, “needed housing” means  all housing on land
zoned for residential use or mixed residential and commercial use that  is determined to meet the
need shown for housing within an urban growth boundary at price ranges and rent  levels that are
affordable to households within the county with a  variety of incomes, including but not limited to
households with low incomes, very low incomes and extremely  low incomes, as those terms are de-
fined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development  under 42 U.S.C. 1437a.
“Needed housing” includes the following housing types:
(a) Attached and  detached single-family housing and multiple family housing for both owner and
renter occupancy;
(b) Government assisted housing;
(c) Mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks as provided in ORS 197.475 to 197.490;
(d) Manufactured homes on individual lots  planned and zoned for single-family residential use
that are in addition to lots within designated manufactured dwelling subdivisions; and
(e) Housing for farmworkers.
(2) For the purpose of estimating housing needs, as  described in ORS 197.296 (3)(b), a local
government shall use  the population projections prescribed by ORS 195.033 or 195.036 and shall
consider and adopt findings related to changes in  each of the following factors since the last [ peri-
odic or legislative review  or six years, whichever is greater, ] review under ORS 197.296 (2)(a)(B) and
the projected future changes in these factors over a 20-year planning period:
(a) Household sizes;
(b) Household demographics [ in terms of age, gender, race or other established demographic cate-
gory];
(c) Household incomes;
(d) Vacancy rates; and
(e) Housing costs.
(3) A local government shall make the estimate described in subsection (2) of  this section using
a shorter time period than since the last [ periodic or legislative review or six years,  whichever is
greater,] review under ORS 197.296  (2)(a)(B)  if the local government finds that the shorter time
period will provide more accurate and reliable  data related to housing need. The shorter time period
may not be less than three years.
(4) A local government shall use data  from a wider geographic area or use a time period longer
than the time period described in subsection  (2) of this section if the analysis of a wider geographic
area or the use of a longer time period will provide more accurate, complete and reliable  data re-
lating to  trends affecting housing need than an analysis performed pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section. The local government must clearly describe  the geographic area, time frame and source of
data used in an estimate performed under this subsection.
(5) Subsection (1)(a) and (d) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A city with a population of less than 2,500.
(b) A county with a population of less than 15,000.
(6) A local government may take an exception under ORS  197.732 to the definition of “needed
housing” in subsection (1) of  this section in the same manner that an exception may be taken under
the goals.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 197.319 is amended to read:
197.319. (1) Before a person may request adoption of an enforcement order under ORS  197.320,
the person shall:
(a) Present the reasons, in writing, for such an order to the affected local government; and
(b) Request:
(A) Revisions to the local comprehensive plan, land use regulations,  special district cooperative
or urban service agreement or decision-making process which is the basis for the order; or
(B) That an  action be taken regarding the local comprehensive plan, land use regulations, spe-
cial district agreement , housing production strategy  or decision-making process that is the  basis
for the order.
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 13
(2)(a) The local government or special district shall issue a  written response to the request
within 60 days of the date the request is mailed to the local government or special district.
(b) The requestor and the  local government or special district may enter into mediation to re-
solve issues in the request. The Department of Land Conservation and Development shall provide
mediation services when jointly requested by the local government or  special district and the
requestor.
(c) If the local government or special district does not act in a  manner which the requestor
believes  is  adequate to address the issues raised in the request within the time period provided in
paragraph (a)  of this subsection, a petition may be presented to the Land Conservation and Devel-
opment Commission under ORS 197.324.
(3) A metropolitan service district may request an enforcement order under ORS  197.320 (12)
without first complying with subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 197.320 is amended to read:
197.320. The Land Conservation and Development Commission shall issue an order  requiring a
local government, state agency or special district to take action necessary to  bring its comprehen-
sive plan, land use regulation, limited land use decisions or other land use decisions or actions into
compliance  with  the goals, acknowledged comprehensive plan provisions , [ or] land use regulations
or housing production strategy  if the commission has good cause to believe:
(1) A comprehensive plan or land use regulation adopted by a local government not on a com-
pliance schedule is not in  compliance with the goals by the date set in ORS 197.245 or 197.250 for
such compliance;
(2) A plan, program, rule or regulation affecting land use adopted by  a state agency or special
district is not in compliance with the goals by the date set in ORS 197.245 or 197.250 for such
compliance;
(3) A  local government is not making satisfactory progress toward performance of its compliance
schedule;
(4) A state agency  is not making satisfactory progress in carrying out its coordination agree-
ment or the requirements of ORS 197.180;
(5) A local government has no comprehensive plan or land use  regulation and is not on a com-
pliance schedule directed to developing the plan or regulation;
(6) A local government has engaged  in a pattern or practice of decision making that violates
an acknowledged  comprehensive plan or land use regulation. In making its determination under this
subsection, the commission shall determine whether there is evidence in the record to  support the
decisions made. The  commission shall not judge the issue solely upon adequacy of the findings in
support of the decisions;
(7) A  local government has failed to comply with a commission order entered under ORS 197.644;
(8) A special district  has engaged in a pattern or practice of decision-making that violates an
acknowledged comprehensive plan or cooperative agreement adopted pursuant to ORS 197.020;
(9) A special district is not making satisfactory progress toward performance of its obligations
under ORS chapters 195 and 197;
(10) A local government’s  approval standards, special conditions on approval of specific devel-
opment proposals or procedures for approval do not comply with ORS 197.307 (4) or (6);
(11) A local government is not making satisfactory progress toward meeting its  obligations un-
der ORS 195.065; [ or]
(12) A local government within the jurisdiction  of a metropolitan service district has failed to
make changes to the comprehensive plan or  land use regulations to comply with the regional
framework plan of the district or has engaged  in a pattern or practice of decision-making that vio-
lates a requirement of the regional framework plan[ .]; or
(13) A city is not making  satisfactory progress in taking actions listed in its housing
production strategy under section 4 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 13.
 Section 1, chapter 47, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) For purposes of this section:
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 14
(a) A household is severely rent burdened  if the household spends more than 50 percent of the
income of the household on gross rent for housing.
(b) A regulated affordable unit is a residential unit subject to  a regulatory agreement that runs
with the land and  that requires affordability for an established income level for a defined period of
time.
(c) A single-family unit may  be rented or owned by a household and includes single-family
homes, duplexes, townhomes, row homes and mobile homes.
(2)(a) The Housing and Community Services Department shall annually provide to the  governing
body of each city in this state with a population greater than 10,000 the  most current data available
from the United States Census Bureau, or any other source the  department considers at least as
reliable, showing the percentage of renter households in the city that are severely rent burdened.
(b) [ The Housing and Community Services Department, in  collaboration with ] The Department of
Land Conservation and Development, in consultation with the Housing and Community Services
Department, shall develop a survey form on which the governing body of a city may  provide spe-
cific information related to the affordability of housing within  the city, including[ , but not limited
to:]
[(A)] the actions relating to land use and other related  matters that the [ governing body ] city
has taken to encourage the development of needed housing, increase the affordability of housing
and reduce rent burdens for severely rent burdened households[ ; and ].
[(B) The additional actions the governing body intends to take to reduce rent burdens for  severely
rent burdened households. ]
(c) [ If the Housing and Community Services Department determines that at least 25 percent  of the
renter households in a  city are severely rent burdened, ] The Department of Land Conservation and
Development shall  provide the governing body of the city with the survey form developed pursuant
to paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(d) The governing body of the city shall return  the completed survey form to the [ Housing and
Community Services Department and the ] Department of Land Conservation and Development  [within
60 days of receipt ] at least  24 months prior to a deadline for completing a housing production
strategy under section 4 of this 2019 Act .
(3)(a) In any  year in which the governing body of a city is informed under this section that at
least 25 percent of the renter households in the city are severely rent burdened, the governing body
shall hold at least one public meeting  to discuss the causes and consequences of severe rent burdens
within the city, the barriers to reducing rent burdens and possible solutions.
(b) The Housing and Community Services  Department may adopt rules governing the conduct
of the public meeting required under this subsection.
(4) No later than February 1 of each year, the governing body of each city in  this state with a
population greater than 10,000 shall submit  to the Department of Land Conservation and Develop-
ment a report  for the immediately preceding calendar year setting forth separately for each of the
following categories the total number of units that were permitted and  the total number that were
produced:
(a) Residential units.
(b) Regulated affordable residential units.
(c) Multifamily residential units.
(d) Regulated affordable multifamily residential units.
(e) Single-family units.
(f) Regulated affordable single-family units.
SECTION 14.
Section 15 of  this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 197.
SECTION 15. (1) As  used in this section, “public property” means all real property of the
state,  counties,  cities, incorporated towns or villages, school districts, irrigation districts,
drainage districts, ports,  water districts, service districts, metropolitan service districts,
housing authorities, public universities listed in ORS 352.002 or all other public or  municipal
corporations in this state.
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 15
(2) Notwithstanding any land use regulation, comprehensive plan,  or statewide land use
planning goal, a local  government may allow the development of housing on public property
provided:
(a) The real property is not inventoried as a park or open space  as a protective measure
pursuant to a statewide land use planning goal;
(b) The real property is located within the urban growth boundary;
(c) The real property is zoned  for residential development or adjacent to parcels zoned
for residential development;
(d) The housing complies with applicable land  use regulations and meets the standards
and criteria  for residential development for the underlying zone of the land or the adjacent
residential land described in paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(e) At least 50  percent of the residential units provided under this section is affordable
to households with incomes  equal to or less than 60 percent of the area median income, as
defined in ORS 456.270; and
(f) The affordability of the residential units described in paragraph (e) of  this subsection
is subject to an affordable housing covenant, as described in ORS  456.270 to 456.295, held by
the local government or the Housing and Community Services Department and with a  dura-
tion of no less than 60 years.
(3) Notwithstanding any statewide land use planning goal,  a local government may amend
its comprehensive plan and land use regulations to allow public property to be used for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 16.
Notwithstanding ORS 197.646, a local government required  to comply with
the amendments to ORS 197.312 by section 6, chapter 745,  Oregon Laws 2017, shall adopt land
use regulations, or adopt amendments to its comprehensive plan, to comply  with the
amendments to ORS 197.312 by section 6, chapter 745, Oregon Laws  2017, no later than the
effective date of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 17.  ORS 215.416 is amended to read:
215.416. (1) When required or authorized  by the ordinances, rules and regulations of a county,
an owner of land may  apply in writing to such persons as the governing body designates, for a
permit, in the manner prescribed by the governing body. The governing body shall establish fees
charged for processing permits at an amount no more than  the actual or average cost of providing
that service.
(2) The governing body shall  establish a consolidated procedure by which an applicant may ap-
ply at one time for all permits or zone changes needed for a development project. The  consolidated
procedure shall be subject to the time limitations set out  in ORS 215.427. The consolidated proce-
dure shall be available for use at the option of the applicant no later  than the time of the first pe-
riodic review of the comprehensive plan and land use regulations.
(3) Except as provided  in subsection (11) of this section, the hearings officer shall hold at least
one public hearing on the application.
(4)(a) A county may not approve an application  if the proposed use of land is found to be in
conflict with the comprehensive plan of the county and other applicable land use regulation  or or-
dinance provisions. The  approval may include such conditions as are authorized by statute or county
legislation.
(b)(A) A county may  not deny an application for a housing development located within the urban
growth boundary if the development complies with clear and  objective standards, including but not
limited to clear and objective design standards contained in the county comprehensive plan  or land
use regulations.
(B) This paragraph does not apply to:
(i) Applications or permits for residential development in areas described in  ORS 197.307 (5); or
(ii) Applications  or permits reviewed under an alternative approval process adopted under ORS
197.307 (6).
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 16
(c) A county may  not [ reduce the density of ] condition an application for a housing development
on a reduction in density  if:
(A) The  density applied for is at or below the authorized density level under the local land use
regulations; and
(B) At least 75 percent of the floor area applied for is reserved for housing.
(d) A county may not [ reduce the height of ] condition an application for a housing development
on a reduction in height  if:
(A) The height applied for is at or  below the authorized height level under the local land use
regulations;
(B) At least 75 percent of the floor area applied for is reserved for housing; and
(C) Reducing the height has the effect of reducing the authorized density  level under local land
use regulations.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection, a county may [ reduce the density
or height of ] condition an  application for a housing development on a reduction in density or
height only  if the reduction is necessary to  resolve a health, safety or habitability issue or to
comply with a protective measure adopted pursuant to a statewide land use planning  goal.
Notwithstanding ORS 197.350, the county must adopt findings supported by substantial  evi-
dence demonstrating the necessity of the reduction.
(f) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Authorized density level” means the  maximum number of lots or dwelling units or the
maximum floor area ratio that is permitted under local land use regulations.
(B) “Authorized height level” means the maximum height of a structure  that is permitted under
local land use regulations.
(C) “Habitability” means being in  compliance with the applicable provisions of the state building
code under ORS chapter 455 and the rules adopted thereunder.
(5) Hearings under this section shall be held only after notice to the applicant  and also notice
to other persons as otherwise provided by law and shall otherwise be  conducted in conformance
with the provisions of ORS 197.763.
(6) Notice of a public hearing on an application submitted under this  section shall be provided
to the owner of an airport defined by the Oregon Department of Aviation as a “public use  airport”
if:
(a) The name and address  of the airport owner has been provided by the Oregon Department
of Aviation to the county planning authority; and
(b) The property subject to the land use hearing is:
(A) Within 5,000 feet of the side or end of a runway  of an airport determined by the Oregon
Department of Aviation to be a “visual airport”; or
(B) Within 10,000 feet of the side or end of the runway of an airport determined by the Oregon
Department of Aviation to be an “instrument airport.”
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (6) of this  section, notice of a land use hearing
need not be provided as set forth in subsection (6)  of this section if the zoning permit would only
allow a structure less than 35 feet in height and the property is located  outside the runway “ap-
proach surface” as defined by the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(8)(a) Approval or denial of a permit application shall be based  on standards and criteria which
shall be set forth in the zoning ordinance  or other appropriate ordinance or regulation of the county
and which shall relate approval or  denial of a permit application to the zoning ordinance and com-
prehensive plan for the area in which the proposed use of land would occur  and to the zoning or-
dinance and comprehensive plan for the county as a whole.
(b) When an ordinance establishing approval standards  is required under ORS 197.307 to provide
only clear and objective standards, the standards must be clear and objective on the face of the
ordinance.
(9) Approval or denial of a permit or expedited land division shall be based  upon and accompa-
nied by a brief statement that explains  the criteria and standards considered relevant to the deci-
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 17
sion, states the facts relied upon in  rendering the decision and explains the justification for the
decision based on the criteria, standards and facts set forth.
(10) Written notice of the approval or denial shall be given to all parties to the proceeding.
(11)(a)(A) The hearings officer or such other person  as the governing body designates may ap-
prove or deny an application for a permit without a hearing if the hearings officer or  other desig-
nated person gives notice of the decision and provides an opportunity for any person who  is
adversely affected or aggrieved, or who is entitled to notice under paragraph (c) of this  subsection,
to file an appeal.
(B) Written notice of the decision shall be mailed to those persons described in  paragraph (c)
of this subsection.
(C) Notice under this subsection shall comply with ORS  197.763 (3)(a), (c), (g) and (h) and shall
describe  the  nature of the decision. In addition, the notice shall state that any person who is ad-
versely affected or aggrieved or who  is entitled to written notice under paragraph (c) of this sub-
section may appeal the  decision by filing a written appeal in the manner and within the time period
provided in the county’s land use regulations. A county may not establish an  appeal period that is
less than 12  days from the date the written notice of decision required by this subsection was
mailed. The notice shall  state that the decision will not become final until the period for filing a
local  appeal  has expired. The notice also shall state that a person who is mailed written notice of
the decision cannot appeal the decision directly to the Land Use Board of Appeals  under ORS
197.830.
(D) An appeal from a hearings officer’s decision  made without hearing under this subsection
shall be to the planning  commission or governing body of the county. An appeal from such other
person as the governing body designates shall be to  a hearings officer, the planning commission or
the governing body. In either case, the appeal shall be to a de novo hearing.
(E) The de novo hearing required by subparagraph (D) of  this paragraph shall be the initial
evidentiary  hearing  required under ORS 197.763 as the basis for an appeal to the Land Use Board
of Appeals. At the de novo hearing:
(i) The applicant and other parties shall  have the same opportunity to present testimony, argu-
ments and evidence as they would have had in a hearing under subsection  (3) of this section before
the decision;
(ii) The presentation of testimony, arguments and evidence shall not be  limited to issues raised
in a notice of appeal; and
(iii) The decision maker shall consider  all relevant testimony, arguments and evidence that are
accepted at the hearing.
(b) If a  local government provides only a notice of the opportunity to request a hearing, the
local government may charge a fee for the initial hearing. The maximum fee for an initial hearing
shall be  the cost to the local government of preparing for and conducting the appeal, or $250,
whichever is less. If an appellant prevails at the hearing or upon  subsequent appeal, the fee for the
initial hearing shall be refunded. The fee allowed in this paragraph  shall not apply to appeals made
by neighborhood or community organizations recognized by the governing body  and whose bounda-
ries include the site.
(c)(A) Notice of a decision  under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be provided to the ap-
plicant and to the owners of record of property on the most recent property tax assessment  roll
where such property is located:
(i) Within 100 feet of the property  that is the subject of the notice when the subject property
is wholly or in part within an urban growth boundary;
(ii) Within  250 feet of the property that is the subject of the notice when the subject property
is outside an urban growth boundary and not within a farm or forest zone; or
(iii) Within 750 feet of the property that is the  subject of the notice when the subject property
is within a farm or forest zone.
(B) Notice shall also be  provided to any neighborhood or community organization recognized by
the governing body and whose boundaries include the site.
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 18
(C) At the discretion of the applicant, the local government also shall  provide notice to the
Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(12) A decision described in ORS 215.402 (4)(b) shall:
(a) Be entered in a registry available to the public setting forth:
(A) The street address or other easily understood geographic reference to the subject property;
(B) The date of the decision; and
(C) A description of the decision made.
(b) Be subject to the jurisdiction of the Land Use Board of Appeals in the same manner  as a
limited land use decision.
(c) Be subject to the appeal period described in ORS 197.830 (5)(b).
(13) At the option of  the applicant, the local government shall provide notice of the decision
described in ORS 215.402 (4)(b) in the manner required by ORS 197.763 (2), in  which case an appeal
to the board shall be filed within 21 days of the decision. The notice shall include an explanation
of appeal rights.
(14) Notwithstanding the  requirements of this section, a limited land use decision shall be sub-
ject to the requirements set forth in ORS 197.195 and 197.828.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 227.175 is amended to read:
227.175. (1) When required or authorized by a city, an owner of land may  apply in writing to the
hearings officer, or such other person as  the city council designates, for a permit or zone change,
upon such forms and in such a manner as the city council prescribes. The  governing body shall es-
tablish fees  charged for processing permits at an amount no more than the actual or average cost
of providing that service.
(2) The governing body of the city shall establish a consolidated procedure  by which an appli-
cant may apply at one time for all permits or zone changes needed for a development project. The
consolidated procedure shall be subject to the time limitations set out in ORS  227.178. The consol-
idated procedure shall be available for use at  the option of the applicant no later than the time of
the first periodic review of the comprehensive plan and land use regulations.
(3) Except as provided  in subsection (10) of this section, the hearings officer shall hold at least
one public hearing on the application.
(4)(a) A city may not approve an application unless the proposed development of land would  be
in compliance with the comprehensive plan for the city and other applicable land use regulation or
ordinance provisions. The approval may include  such conditions as are authorized by ORS 227.215
or any city legislation.
(b)(A) A city may not deny an application for a housing development located within the  urban
growth boundary if the development complies with clear and objective standards, including [ but not
limited to ] clear and objective design standards contained in the  city comprehensive plan or land
use regulations.
(B) This paragraph does not apply to:
(i) Applications or permits for residential development in areas described in  ORS 197.307 (5); or
(ii) Applications or permits reviewed under an alternative approval process adopted under  ORS
197.307 (6).
(c) A  city may not [ reduce the density of ] condition an application for a housing development
on a reduction in density  if:
(A) The density applied for is at or below the authorized density level under the local land  use
regulations;  and
(B) At least 75 percent of the floor area applied for is reserved for housing.
(d) A city may not [ reduce the height of ] condition an application for a housing development on
a reduction in height  if:
(A) The height applied for is at or below the authorized  height level under the local land use
regulations;
(B) At least 75 percent of the floor area applied for is reserved for housing; and
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 19
(C) Reducing the height has the effect of reducing the authorized density  level under local land
use regulations.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection, a city may [ reduce the density  or
height of ] condition an application for a housing development on a reduction in density or height
only if the reduction is necessary to resolve a  health, safety or habitability issue or to comply with
a protective measure  adopted pursuant to a statewide land use planning goal. Notwithstanding
ORS 197.350, the city must adopt findings supported by substantial evidence demonstrating
the necessity of the reduction.
(f) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Authorized density level” means the  maximum number of lots or dwelling units or the
maximum floor area ratio that is permitted under local land use regulations.
(B) “Authorized height level” means the maximum height of a structure  that is permitted under
local land use regulations.
(C) “Habitability” means being in  compliance with the applicable provisions of the state building
code under ORS chapter 455 and the rules adopted thereunder.
(5) Hearings under this section may be held only after notice to the applicant and other  inter-
ested persons and shall otherwise be conducted in conformance with the provisions  of ORS 197.763.
(6) Notice of a public  hearing on a zone use application shall be provided to the owner of an
airport, defined by the Oregon Department of Aviation as a “public use airport” if:
(a) The name and address  of the airport owner has been provided by the Oregon Department
of Aviation to the city planning authority; and
(b) The property subject to the zone use hearing is:
(A) Within 5,000 feet of the side or end of a runway  of an airport determined by the Oregon
Department of Aviation to be a “visual airport”; or
(B) Within 10,000 feet of the side or end of the runway of an airport determined by the Oregon
Department of Aviation to be an “instrument airport.”
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection  (6) of this section, notice of a zone use hearing
need only be  provided as set forth in subsection (6) of this section if the permit or zone change
would only allow  a structure less than 35 feet in height and the property is located outside of the
runway “approach surface” as defined by the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(8) If an application would change the zone of property that includes all or part of  a mobile
home or manufactured dwelling park as defined  in ORS 446.003, the governing body shall give
written notice by first class mail to each existing mailing address for tenants of the mobile  home
or manufactured dwelling  park at least 20 days but not more than 40 days before the date of the
first hearing on the application. The governing body may require an applicant for such a zone
change to pay the costs of such notice.
(9) The failure of a  tenant or an airport owner to receive a notice which was mailed shall not
invalidate any zone change.
(10)(a)(A) The hearings officer or such other person  as the governing body designates may ap-
prove or deny an application for a permit without a hearing if the hearings officer or  other desig-
nated person gives notice of the decision and provides an opportunity for any person who  is
adversely affected or aggrieved, or who is entitled to notice under paragraph (c) of this  subsection,
to file an appeal.
(B) Written notice of the decision shall be mailed to those persons described in  paragraph (c)
of this subsection.
(C) Notice under this subsection shall comply with ORS  197.763 (3)(a), (c), (g) and (h) and shall
describe  the  nature of the decision. In addition, the notice shall state that any person who is ad-
versely affected or aggrieved or who  is entitled to written notice under paragraph (c) of this sub-
section may appeal the  decision by filing a written appeal in the manner and within the time period
provided in the city’s land use regulations. A city may not establish an appeal period  that is less
than 12 days from  the date the written notice of decision required by this subsection was mailed.
The notice shall state that the decision will not become final until the period for filing  a local ap-
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 20
peal has expired. The notice also shall state that a person who is mailed written notice of  the de-
cision cannot appeal the decision directly to the Land Use Board of Appeals under ORS 197.830.
(D) An appeal from a hearings officer’s  decision made without hearing under this subsection
shall be to the planning  commission or governing body of the city. An appeal from such other person
as the governing body  designates shall be to a hearings officer, the planning commission or the
governing body. In either case, the appeal shall be to a de novo hearing.
(E) The de novo hearing required by subparagraph (D) of  this paragraph shall be the initial
evidentiary  hearing  required under ORS 197.763 as the basis for an appeal to the Land Use Board
of Appeals. At the de novo hearing:
(i) The applicant and other parties shall  have the same opportunity to present testimony, argu-
ments and evidence as they would have had in a hearing under subsection  (3) of this section before
the decision;
(ii) The presentation of testimony, arguments and evidence shall not be  limited to issues raised
in a notice of appeal; and
(iii) The decision maker shall consider  all relevant testimony, arguments and evidence that are
accepted at the hearing.
(b) If a  local government provides only a notice of the opportunity to request a hearing, the
local government may charge a fee for the initial hearing. The maximum fee for an initial hearing
shall be  the cost to the local government of preparing for and conducting the appeal, or $250,
whichever is less. If an appellant prevails at the hearing or upon  subsequent appeal, the fee for the
initial hearing shall be refunded. The fee allowed in this paragraph  shall not apply to appeals made
by neighborhood or community organizations recognized by the governing body  and whose bounda-
ries include the site.
(c)(A) Notice of a decision  under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be provided to the ap-
plicant and to the owners of record of property on the most recent property tax assessment  roll
where such property is located:
(i) Within 100 feet of the property  that is the subject of the notice when the subject property
is wholly or in part within an urban growth boundary;
(ii) Within  250 feet of the property that is the subject of the notice when the subject property
is outside an urban growth boundary and not within a farm or forest zone; or
(iii) Within 750 feet of the property that is the  subject of the notice when the subject property
is within a farm or forest zone.
(B) Notice shall also be  provided to any neighborhood or community organization recognized by
the governing body and whose boundaries include the site.
(C) At the discretion of the applicant, the local government also shall  provide notice to the
Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(11) A decision described in ORS 227.160 (2)(b) shall:
(a) Be entered in a registry available to the public setting forth:
(A) The street address or other easily understood geographic reference to the subject property;
(B) The date of the decision; and
(C) A description of the decision made.
(b) Be subject  to the jurisdiction of the Land Use Board of Appeals in the same manner as a
limited land use decision.
(c) Be subject to the appeal period described in ORS 197.830 (5)(b).
(12) At the option of the applicant, the local government shall provide  notice of the decision
described in ORS 227.160 (2)(b) in the manner required by ORS 197.763 (2), in  which case an appeal
to the board shall be filed  within 21 days of the decision. The notice shall include an explanation
of appeal rights.
(13) Notwithstanding other requirements of this section, limited  land use decisions shall be
subject to the requirements set forth in ORS 197.195 and 197.828.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 215.441 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 21
215.441. (1) If a church, synagogue, temple, mosque, chapel, meeting  house or other nonresiden-
tial place of worship is allowed on real property under state law and rules  and local zoning ordi-
nances and regulations, a county shall allow the reasonable use  of the real property for activities
customarily associated with the practices of the religious activity, including:
(a) Worship services.
(b) Religion classes.
(c) Weddings.
(d) Funerals.
(e) Meal programs.
(f) Child care, but not including private or  parochial school education for prekindergarten
through grade 12 or higher education.
(g) Providing housing or space for  housing in a building or buildings that [ is] are detached from
the place of worship, provided:
(A) At least 50 percent of the residential units provided under this  paragraph are affordable to
households with incomes equal  to or less than 60 percent of the median family income for the county
in which the real property is located;
(B) The real property is in an area zoned for residential use that is located within the urban
growth boundary; and
(C) The housing or space for housing complies with  applicable land use regulations and meets
the standards and criteria for residential development for the underlying zone.
(2) A county may:
(a) Subject real property described in subsection  (1) of this section to reasonable regulations,
including site review or design review, concerning the  physical characteristics of the uses author-
ized under subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) Prohibit or restrict the use of real property by a place of worship described  in subsection
(1) of this section if the county finds that the level of service of public facilities,  including trans-
portation,  water  supply, sewer and storm drain systems is not adequate to serve the place of worship
described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Notwithstanding  any other provision of this section, a county may allow a private or paro-
chial school for prekindergarten through grade 12 or higher  education to be sited under applicable
state law and rules and local zoning ordinances and regulations.
(4) Housing and space for housing provided under subsection  (1)(g) of this section must be sub-
ject to a covenant appurtenant that restricts the owner and each successive owner of [ the] a build-
ing or any residential unit  contained in [ the] a building from selling or renting any residential unit
described in subsection (1)(g)(A) of this section as housing that is not  affordable to households with
incomes equal to or less than 60 percent of the median family income for the county in which  the
real property is located for a period of 60 years from the date of the certificate of occupancy.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 227.500 is amended to read:
227.500. (1) If a church,  synagogue, temple, mosque, chapel, meeting house or other nonresiden-
tial place of worship is  allowed on real property under state law and rules and local zoning ordi-
nances and regulations, a city  shall allow the reasonable use of the real property for activities
customarily associated with the practices of the religious activity, including:
(a) Worship services.
(b) Religion classes.
(c) Weddings.
(d) Funerals.
(e) Meal programs.
(f) Child care, but not including  private or parochial school education for prekindergarten
through grade 12 or higher education.
(g) Providing housing or space for  housing in a building or buildings that [ is] are detached from
the place of worship, provided:
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 22
(A) At least 50 percent  of the residential units provided under this paragraph are affordable to
households with incomes equal  to or less than 60 percent of the median family income for the county
in which the real property is located;
(B) The real property is in an area zoned for residential use that is located within the urban
growth boundary; and
(C) The housing or space for housing complies with  applicable land use regulations and meets
the standards and criteria for residential development for the underlying zone.
(2) A city may:
(a) Subject real property described in subsection  (1) of this section to reasonable regulations,
including site review and design review, concerning  the physical characteristics of the uses au-
thorized under subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) Prohibit or  regulate the use of real property by a place of worship described in subsection
(1) of this section if the city finds that the level of service of public facilities,  including transporta-
tion, water supply, sewer and storm drain systems is not adequate to serve the place  of worship
described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a city may allow  a private or parochial
school for prekindergarten through grade 12 or higher education  to be sited under applicable state
law and rules and local zoning ordinances and regulations.
(4) Housing and space for housing provided under subsection  (1)(g) of this section must be sub-
ject to a covenant appurtenant that restricts the owner and each successive owner of [ the] a build-
ing or any residential unit  contained in [ the] a building from selling or renting any residential unit
described in subsection (1)(g)(A) of this section as housing that is not  affordable to households with
incomes equal to or less than 60 percent of the median family income for the county in which  the
real property is located for a period of 60 years from the date of the certificate of occupancy.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 455.062 is amended to read:
455.062. (1) A Department of Consumer and Business Services  employee acting within the scope
of that employment may provide typical plans and specifications:
(a) For structures of a  type for which the provision of plans or specifications is exempted under
ORS 671.030 from the application of ORS 671.010 to 671.220 and  exempted under ORS 672.060 from
the application of ORS 672.002 to 672.325; and
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 671.010 to 671.220 and 672.002 to 672.325, for structures that are metal
or wood frame Use and Occupancy Classification  Group U structures under the structural specialty
code.
(2) A Department of Consumer and Business Services employee, who is licensed  or reg-
istered under ORS 671.010  to 671.220 or 672.002 to 672.325, who is acting within the scope of
that employment and who  is providing typical plans and specifications under subsection (1)
of this section, is not  required to seal or sign the typical plans and specifications and is not
subject to disciplinary  action under ORS 671.010 to 671.220 or 672.002 to 672.325 based on
providing those typical plans and specifications.
[(2)] (3) A building official or inspector, as  those terms are defined in ORS 455.715, when acting
within the scope of direct employment by a municipality, may provide typical plans and  specifica-
tions for structures of a type for which the  provision of plans or specifications is exempted under
ORS 671.030 from the application of ORS 671.010 to 671.220 and  exempted under ORS 672.060 from
the application of ORS 672.002 to 672.325.
[(3)] This [ section] subsection  does not alter any applicable requirement under ORS 671.010  to
671.220 or 672.002 to 672.325 regarding stamps and seals for a set of plans for a structure.
SECTION 21a.  If Senate Bill 39 becomes law, ORS 455.062, as  amended by section 2, chapter
97, Oregon  Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 39), and section 21 of this 2019 Act, is amended to read:
455.062. (1) A Department of Consumer and Business Services  employee acting within the scope
of that employment may provide typical drawings and specifications:
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 23
(a) For  structures of a type for which the provision of drawings or specifications is exempted
under ORS 671.030 from the application of ORS 671.010  to 671.220 and exempted under ORS 672.060
from the registration requirements of ORS 672.002 to 672.325; and
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 671.010 to 671.220 and 672.002 to 672.325, for structures that are metal
or wood frame Use and Occupancy Classification  Group U structures under the structural specialty
code.
(2) A Department of Consumer  and Business Services employee, who is licensed or registered
under ORS 671.010 to 671.220 or 672.002  to 672.325, who is acting within the scope of that employ-
ment and who is  providing typical [ plans] drawings and specifications under subsection (1) of this
section, is not required to seal or sign the typical [ plans] drawings and specifications and is not
subject to disciplinary  action under ORS 671.010 to 671.220 or 672.002 to 672.325 based on providing
those typical [ plans] drawings and specifications.
(3) A building official or  inspector, as those terms are defined in ORS 455.715, when acting
within the scope  of direct employment by a municipality, may provide typical drawings or specifi-
cations for structures  of a type for which the provision of drawings or specifications is exempted
under ORS 671.030 from the application of ORS 671.010  to 671.220 and exempted under ORS 672.060
from the  registration requirements of ORS 672.002 to 672.325. This subsection does not alter any
applicable requirement under ORS 671.010 to  671.220 or 672.002 to 672.325 regarding stamps and
seals for a set of plans for a structure.
SECTION 21b. If Senate Bill 39 becomes law, section 3, chapter 97, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 39), is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  The  amendments to ORS 455.062 and 672.060 by sections 1 and 2 [ of this 2019 Act ],
chapter 97, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 39), and section 21a of this 2019 Act  apply
to work performed, and offers made, on or after the effective date of  [ this 2019 Act ] chapter 97,
Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 39) .
SECTION 22. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Land Conservation  and Development, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2019, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, to provide technical
assistance to local governments to implement sections 4 to 6  and 15 of this 2019 Act and the
amendments to ORS 197.296, 197.299, 197.303, 197.319,  197.320, 215.416, 215.441, 227.175 and
227.500 and section 1, chapter  47, Oregon Laws 2018, by sections 8 to 13 and 17 to 20 of this
2019 Act.
SECTION 23. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $655,274, for research,  administration
and reporting that relate to a regional housing needs analysis described in section 1 of this
2019 Act.
SECTION 24.
(1) Sections 4 to 6 of this 2019 Act and the amendments to ORS  197.296,
197.299, 197.303, 197.319 and 197.320 and section 1, chapter 47, Oregon Laws 2018, by sections
8 to 13 of this 2019 Act become operative on January 1, 2020.
(2) The  Land Conservation and Development Commission, the Department of Land Con-
servation and Development and the Housing and Community Services Department  may take
any action before the operative date  specified in subsection (1) of this section that is neces-
sary for the departments and the commission to exercise, on or after  the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and  powers conferred
on the departments and the commission by sections 4 to 6 of this 2019 Act and  the amend-
ments to ORS 197.296, 197.299, 197.303, 197.319,  197.320 and section 1, chapter 47, Oregon Laws
2018, by sections 8 to 13 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 25. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 24
Passed by House June 26, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2003 (HB 2003-C) Page 25